Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2845.01
Telepharmacy, defined.

Telepharmacy means the provision of pharmacist care, by a pharmacist located within the United States, using telecommunications, remote order entry, or other automations and technologies to deliver care to patients or their agents who are located at sites other than where the pharmacist is located.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 40.